src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-3lex_cielattid_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: # MLO, checked

  Verb - cielâttiđ: #: MLO, checked
    cielâttiđ+V+Inf: cielâttiđ
    cielâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cielâttâm
    cielâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: cielâttah
    cielâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cielât
    cielâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: cielâtteen
    cielâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: cielâtvettee
    cielâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: cielâttává
    cielâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: cielâttep
    cielâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: cielâtvetteđ
    cielâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: cielâtteh
    cielâttiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: cielâttim
    cielâttiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: cielâttih
    cielâttiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: cielâttij
    cielâttiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: cielâttáim
    cielâttiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: cielâttáid
    cielâttiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: cielâttáin
    cielâttiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: cielâttijm
    cielâttiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: cielâttijd
    cielâttiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: cielâttii
    cielâttiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: cielâttiččim
    cielâttiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: cielâttiččih
    cielâttiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: cielâttičij
    cielâttiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: cielâttiččijm
    cielâttiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: cielâttiččijd
    cielâttiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: cielâttiččijn
    cielâttiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: cielâttiččijm
    cielâttiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: cielâttiččijd
    cielâttiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: cielâttiččii
    cielâttiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: cielâttižžeem
    cielâttiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: cielâttižžeeh
    cielâttiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: cielâttiš
    cielâttiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: cielâttižžeen
    cielâttiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: cielâttišvettee
    cielâttiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: cielâttižává
    cielâttiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: cielâttižžep
    cielâttiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: cielâttišvetteđ
    cielâttiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: cielâttižeh
    cielâttiđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: cielât
    cielâttiđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: cielâttus
    cielâttiđ+V+Imprt+Du1: cielâttoon
    cielâttiđ+V+Imprt+Du2: cielâttee
    cielâttiđ+V+Imprt+Du3: cielâttus
    cielâttiđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: cielâttop
    cielâttiđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: cielâttiđ
    cielâttiđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: cielâttus
    cielâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: cielât
    cielâttiđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: cielâttâm
    cielâttiđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: cielâttiččii
    cielâttiđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: cielâttižžii
    cielâttiđ+V+PrsPrc: [cielâtteijee, cielâttijjee]
    cielâttiđ+V+PrfPrc: cielâttâm
    cielâttiđ+V+Actio+Nom: cielâttem
    cielâttiđ+V+Actio+Ess: cielâtmin
    cielâttiđ+V+Actio+Loc: cielâtmist
    cielâttiđ+V+Actio+Ill: cielâtmân
    cielâttiđ+V+Ger: cielâtdijn
    cielâttiđ+V+VAbess: cielâthánnáá
